Florida, session 2026, HB285.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (7), (8), and (9) of section
960.001, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (8),
(9), and (10), respectively, and a new subsection (7) is added
to that section to read:
960.001 Guidelines for fair treatment of victims and
witnesses in the criminal justice and juvenile justice systems.—
(7) A victim may:
(a) Refuse to communicate with the defendant's attorney.
(b) Require that the prosecutor be notified of and present
for any and all communications between the defendant's attorney
and the victim.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb285-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 285 2026
960.0021, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
960.0021 Legislative intent; advisement to victims.—
(2) The courts may fulfill their obligation to advise
crime victims by doing one of the following:
(a) Making the following announcement at any arraignment,
sentencing, or case-management proceeding:

"If you are the victim of a crime with a case pending before
this court, you are advised that you have the right, upon
request:
1. To be informed.
2. To be present.
3. To be heard at all stages of criminal proceedings.
4. To receive advance notification, when possible, of
judicial proceedings and notification of scheduling changes,
pursuant to section 960.001, Florida Statutes.
5. To seek crimes compensation and restitution.
6. To consult with the state attorney's office in certain
felony cases regarding the disposition of the case.
7. To make an oral or written victim impact statement at
the time of sentencing of a defendant.
8. To refuse to communicate with the defendant's attorney.
9. To have the prosecutor notified of and present for any
and all communications with the defendant's attorney.

Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb285-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 285 2026
For further information regarding additional rights afforded to
victims of crime, you may contact the state attorney's office or
obtain a listing of your rights from the Clerk of Court."
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb285-00